Missouri, session 2026, SB1467.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.610, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.610,
to read as follows:
537.610. 1. The commissioner of administration,
through the purchasing division, and the governing body of
each political subdivision of this state, notwithstanding
any other provision of law, may purchase liability insurance
for tort claims, made against the state or the political
subdivision, but the maximum amount of such coverage shall
not exceed two million dollars for all claims arising out of
a single occurrence and shall not exceed three hundred
thousand dollars for any one person in a single accident or
occurrence, except for those claims governed by the
provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law,
chapter 287, and no amount in excess of the above limits
shall be awarded or settled upon. Sovereign immunity for
the state of Missouri and its political subdivisions is
waived only to the maximum amount of and only for the
purposes covered by such policy of insurance purchased
pursuant to the provisions of this section and in such

SB 1467 2
amount and for such purposes provided in any self-insurance
plan duly adopted by the governing body of any political
subdivision of the state.
2. The liability of the state and its public entities
on claims within the scope of sections 537.600 to 537.650,
shall not exceed two million dollars for all claims arising
out of a single accident or occurrence and shall not exceed
three hundred thousand dollars for any one person in a
single accident or occurrence, except for those claims
governed by the provisions of the Missouri workers'
compensation law, chapter 287.
3. No award for damages on any claim against a public
entity within the scope of sections 537.600 to 537.650,
shall include punitive or exemplary damages.
4. If the amount awarded to or settled upon multiple
claimants exceeds two million dollars, any party may apply
to any circuit court to apportion to each claimant his
proper share of the total amount limited by subsection 1 of
this section. The share apportioned each claimant shall be
in the proportion that the ratio of the award or settlement
made to him bears to the aggregate awards and settlements
for all claims arising out of the accident or occurrence,
but the share shall not exceed three hundred thousand
dollars.
5. The limitation on awards for liability provided for
in this section shall be increased or decreased on an annual
basis effective January first of each year in accordance
with the Implicit Price Deflator for Personal Consumption
Expenditures as published by the Bureau of Economic Analysis
of the United States Department of Commerce. The current
value of the limitation shall be calculated by the director
of the department of commerce and insurance, who shall

SB 1467 3
furnish that value to the secretary of state, who shall
publish such value in the Missouri Register as soon after
each January first as practicable, but it shall otherwise be
exempt from the provisions of section 536.021. The
applicable limitation on awards for liability provided for
in this section as to a given claim shall be the limitation
then in effect on the date of the accident or occurrence
giving rise to the claim.
6. Any claim filed against any public entity under
this section shall be subject to the penalties provided by
supreme court rule 55.03, or any successor rule.
✓